Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2909
Use of terms or abbreviation.

The use of the terms "cooperative or nonstock cooperative" or an abbreviation of the terms under the Nebraska Limited Cooperative Association Act is not a violation of the provisions restricting the use of the terms under the Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act or sections 21-1301 to 21-1339, however, use of the term "cooperative" by a limited cooperative association shall not be construed under any other law to qualify a limited cooperative association as a cooperative organized under the Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act or sections 21-1301 to 21-1339.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 9.

Nonstock Cooperative Marketing Act, see section 21-1401.